Utah statutes.
13-49-402.   Violations -- Actions by division.

(1)  The division shall investigate and take action under this part for violations of this chapter.

(2)  A person who violates this chapter is subject to:

(a)  a cease and desist order; and

(b)  an administrative fine of not less than $100 or more than $5,000 for each separate violation.

(3)  An administrative fine shall be deposited in the Consumer Protection Education and Training Fund created in Section 13-2-8.

(4) (a)  A person who intentionally violates this chapter:

(i)  is guilty of a class A misdemeanor; and

(ii)  may be fined up to $10,000.

(b)  A person intentionally violates this part if the violation occurs after the division, attorney general, or a district or county attorney notifies the person by certified mail that the person is in violation of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 375, 2012 General Session

